Utah statutes.
63M-1-1304.   Council powers and duties.

(1)  The council shall:

(a)  coordinate and advise on policies and objectives related to economic development and growth within the state;

(b)  coordinate with state and private entities, including private venture capital and seed capital firms, to avoid duplication of programs and to increase the availability of venture and seed capital for research and for the development and growth of new and existing businesses in the state;

(c)  focus on technologies, industries, and geographical areas of the state in which the state can expand investment and entrepreneurship and stimulate job growth;

(d)  coordinate ideas and strategies to increase national and international business activities for both the urban and rural areas of the state; and

(e)  plan, coordinate, advise, or recommend any other action that would better the state's economy.

(2)  The council shall submit an annual written report of its activities to the governor and to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee by November 1.

